District of Columbia statutes.
8-111.08

Cease and desist order.

If the Mayor determines that a hazardous condition exists that may endanger the public health or safety of the District of Columbia due to noncompliance with federal or District laws or rules on asbestos abatement, the Mayor may issue a cease and desist order to require a violator to cease asbestos abatement operations immediately, remove asbestos workers from the asbestos abatement project area, evacuate appropriate areas of the asbestos abatement project site, or take emergency measures necessary to contain the hazardous condition. Any business entity subject to a cease and desist order may appeal the order within 15 days, but is required to comply with the order pending appeal.

History

May 1, 1990, D.C. Law 8-116, § 9, 37 DCR 1641

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-991.8.